Hawaii, session 2026, SB2058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§28-    Safe community places.  (a) The attorney general shall designate facilities operated by the State to serve as safe community places, including all: (1)  Hospitals and other facilities that provide health care services; (2)  Schools and pre-schools; (3)  Libraries; (4)  Disaster and emergency response sites; (5)  Courthouses; (6)  Homeless shelters, rape crisis centers, domestic violence shelters, family justice centers, and human trafficking service providers; (7)  Legal service providers; (8)  Park and recreation centers; (9)  Community resource centers; and (10)  Other locations designated by the attorney general. (b) No employee or agent acting on behalf of a safe community place shall provide voluntary consent for federal law enforcement agents to enter a nonpublic area of the facility for operations that identify or seek to identify, apprehend, arrest, or impose any other civil or criminal penalty for: (1)  Activities protected by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution, including rights to free speech and press, peaceable assembly, and petition the government for a redress of grievances; or (2)  Immigration enforcement. (c) This section shall not prevent an employee or agent acting on behalf of a safe community place from complying with a valid judicial warrant." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________